Utah statutes.
10-3-708.   Arrangement of ordinances.

The ordinances in the revision, codification and compilation shall be arranged in such order as the governing body may decide and may exclude the titles, enacting clauses, signatures of a mayor or mayor pro tempore of the governing board, attestations, and other formal parts, except the attestation of the recorder.



Enacted by Chapter 48, 1977 General Session

